Maryland, session 2025, HB0298.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Education
11–409.
(A) (1) THE COMMISSION SHALL COLLECT DATA FROM EACH PUBLIC
INSTITUTION OF HIGHER EDUCATION IN THE STATE ON THE PARENTAL STATUS OF
STUDENTS ENROLLED IN EACH INSTITUTION.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from existing law.
Underlining indicates amendments to bill.
Strike out indicates matter stricken from the bill by amendment or deleted from the law by
amendment. *hb0298*

HOUSE BILL 298
(2) THE COMMISSION, IN CONSULTATION WITH THE PUBLIC
INSTITUTIONS OF HIGHER EDUCATION, SHALL DEVELOP QUESTIONS THAT ALLOW
EACH STUDENT TO IDENTIFY:
(I) WHETHER THE STUDENT IS A PARENT, ACTING AS A
PARENT, OR A LEGAL GUARDIAN;
(II) THE AGE OF THE CHILDREN FOR WHICH THE STUDENT HAS
RESPONSIBILITY; AND
(III) THE TYPE OF CAREGIVING RESPONSIBILITIES THE
STUDENT PROVIDES, INCLUDING WHETHER THE STUDENT:
1. IS A SINGLE PARENT; OR
2. SHARES PARENTAL RESPONSIBILITIES WITH
SOMEONE IN THE SAME HOUSEHOLD OR A DIFFERENT HOUSEHOLD.
(B) (1) EACH PUBLIC INSTITUTION OF HIGHER EDUCATION SHALL PLACE
THE QUESTIONS DEVELOPED UNDER SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS SECTION ON ONE OR
MORE FORMS THAT ARE USED BY THE INSTITUTION TO COLLECT DEMOGRAPHIC
DATA FROM STUDENTS.
(2) EACH PUBLIC INSTITUTION OF HIGHER EDUCATION SHALL MAKE
THE DATA COLLECTED UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION AVAILABLE TO
THE COMMISSION IN ACCORDANCE WITH THE FORMAT DETERMINED BY THE
COMMISSION UNDER SUBSECTION (C) OF THIS SECTION.
(C) THE COMMISSION SHALL ADOPT REGULATIONS TO CARRY OUT THIS
SECTION, INCLUDING:
(1) ESTABLISHING A COMMON FORMAT AND TIME FRAME FOR THE
COLLECTION AND REPORTING OF THE DATA REQUIRED UNDER THIS SECTION; AND
(2) A REQUIREMENT THAT THE COLLECTION OF PARENTAL STATUS
DATA BE INCLUDED WITH THE COLLECTION OF OTHER DEMOGRAPHIC DATA.
(D) ON OR BEFORE SEPTEMBER 1, 2026, AND EACH SEPTEMBER 1
THEREAFTER, THE COMMISSION SHALL SUBMIT A REPORT TO THE SENATE BUDGET
AND TAXATION COMMITTEE, THE SENATE COMMITTEE ON EDUCATION, ENERGY,
AND THE ENVIRONMENT, AND THE HOUSE APPROPRIATIONS COMMITTEE, IN

HOUSE BILL 298 3
ACCORDANCE WITH § 2–1257 OF THE STATE GOVERNMENT ARTICLE, THAT
SUMMARIZES THE DATA COLLECTED BY THE COMMISSION UNDER THIS SECTION.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2025.
Approved:
________________________________________________________________________________
Governor.
________________________________________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Delegates.
________________________________________________________________________________
President of the Senate.